Florida, session 2026, SB698.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 21 22 Section 1.âSubsection (4) of section 381.0065, Florida 23 Statutes, is amended to read: 24 381.0065âOnsite sewage treatment and disposal systems; 25 regulation.â 26 (4)âPERMITS; INSTALLATION; CONDITIONS.âA person may not 27 construct, repair, modify, abandon, or operate an onsite sewage 28 treatment and disposal system without first obtaining a permit 29 approved by the department. The department may issue permits to 30 carry out this section, except that the issuance of a permit for 31 work seaward of the coastal construction control line 32 established under s. 161.053 shall be contingent upon receipt of 33 any required coastal construction control line permit from the 34 department. A construction permit is valid for 18 months after 35 the date of issuance and may be extended by the department for 36 one 90-day period under rules adopted by the department. A 37 repair permit is valid for 90 days after the date of issuance. 38 An operating permit must be obtained before the use of any 39 aerobic treatment unit or if the establishment generates 40 commercial waste. Buildings or establishments that use an 41 aerobic treatment unit or generate commercial waste shall be 42 inspected by the department at least annually to assure 43 compliance with the terms of the operating permit. The operating 44 permit for a commercial wastewater system is valid for 1 year 45 after the date of issuance and must be renewed annually. The 46 operating permit for an aerobic treatment unit is valid for 2 47 years after the date of issuance and must be renewed every 2 48 years. If all information pertaining to the siting, location, 49 and installation conditions or repair of an onsite sewage 50 treatment and disposal system remains the same, a construction 51 or repair permit for the onsite sewage treatment and disposal 52 system may be transferred to another person, if the transferee 53 files, within 60 days after the transfer of ownership, an 54 amended application providing all corrected information and 55 proof of ownership of the property. A fee is not associated with 56 the processing of this supplemental information. A person may 57 not contract to construct, modify, alter, repair, service, 58 abandon, or maintain any portion of an onsite sewage treatment 59 and disposal system without being registered under part III of 60 chapter 489. A property owner who personally performs 61 construction, maintenance, or repairs to a system serving his or 62 her own owner-occupied single-family residence is exempt from 63 registration requirements for performing such construction, 64 maintenance, or repairs on that residence, but is subject to all 65 permitting requirements. Except as provided in paragraph (a), a 66 municipality or political subdivision of the state may not issue 67 a building or plumbing permit for any building that requires the 68 use of an onsite sewage treatment and disposal system unless the 69 owner or builder has received a construction permit for such 70 system from the department. A building or structure may not be 71 occupied and a municipality, political subdivision, or any state 72 or federal agency may not authorize occupancy until the 73 department approves the final installation of the onsite sewage 74 treatment and disposal system. A municipality or political 75 subdivision of the state may not approve any change in occupancy 76 or tenancy of a building that uses an onsite sewage treatment 77 and disposal system until the department has reviewed the use of 78 the system with the proposed change, approved the change, and 79 amended the operating permit. 80 (a)âIf the building or plumbing permit is for a single 81 family residence that requires the use of an onsite sewage 82 treatment and disposal system, a municipality or political 83 subdivision of the state may not require the owner or builder to 84 receive a construction permit from the department for such 85 system as a condition of issuing the building or plumbing 86 permit. The owner or builder of the single-family residence must 87 provide to a municipality or political subdivision proof that 88 the owner or builder submitted an application for the onsite 89 sewage treatment and disposal system when applying for a 90 building and plumbing permit. 91 (b)âIf construction of the onsite sewage treatment and 92 disposal system commences before the issuance of the permit for 93 the onsite sewage treatment and disposal system, the property 94 owner or the applicant must assume all legal, financial, and 95 safety liabilities arising therefrom. 96 (c)(a)âSubdivisions and lots in which each lot has a 97 minimum area of at least one-half acre and either a minimum 98 dimension of 100 feet or a mean of at least 100 feet of the side 99 bordering the street and the distance formed by a line parallel 100 to the side bordering the street drawn between the two most 101 distant points of the remainder of the lot may be developed with 102 a water system regulated under s. 381.0062 and onsite sewage 103 treatment and disposal systems, provided the projected daily 104 sewage flow does not exceed an average of 1,500 gallons per acre 105 per day, and provided satisfactory drinking water can be 106 obtained and all distance and setback, soil condition, water 107 table elevation, and other related requirements of this section 108 and rules adopted under this section can be met. 109 (d)(b)âSubdivisions and lots using a public water system as 110 defined in s. 403.852 may use onsite sewage treatment and 111 disposal systems, provided there are no more than four lots per 112 acre, provided the projected daily sewage flow does not exceed 113 an average of 2,500 gallons per acre per day, and provided that 114 all distance and setback, soil condition, water table elevation, 115 and other related requirements that are generally applicable to 116 the use of onsite sewage treatment and disposal systems are met. 117 (e)(c)âNotwithstanding paragraphs (c) and (d) (a) and (b), 118 for subdivisions platted of record on or before October 1, 1991, 119 when a developer or other appropriate entity has previously made 120 or makes provisions, including financial assurances or other 121 commitments, acceptable to the department, that a central water 122 system will be installed by a regulated public utility based on 123 a density formula, private potable wells may be used with onsite 124 sewage treatment and disposal systems until the agreed-upon 125 densities are reached. In a subdivision regulated by this 126 paragraph, the average daily sewage flow may not exceed 2,500 127 gallons per acre per day. This section does not affect the 128 validity of existing prior agreements. After October 1, 1991, 129 the exception provided under this paragraph is not available to 130 a developer or other appropriate entity. 131 (f)(d)âParagraphs (c) and (d) (a) and (b) do not apply to 132 any proposed residential subdivision with more than 50 lots or 133 to any proposed commercial subdivision with more than 5 lots 134 where a publicly owned or investor-owned sewage treatment system 135 is available. This paragraph does not allow development of 136 additional proposed subdivisions in order to evade the 137 requirements of this paragraph. 138 (g)(e)âThe department shall adopt rules relating to the 139 location of onsite sewage treatment and disposal systems, 140 including establishing setback distances, to prevent groundwater 141 contamination and surface water contamination and to preserve 142 the public health. The rules must consider conventional and 143 enhanced nutrient-reducing onsite sewage treatment and disposal 144 system designs, impaired or degraded water bodies, domestic 145 wastewater and drinking water infrastructure, potable water 146 sources, nonpotable wells, stormwater infrastructure, the onsite 147 sewage treatment and disposal system remediation plans developed 148 pursuant to s. 403.067(7)(a)9.b., nutrient pollution, and the 149 recommendations of the onsite sewage treatment and disposal 150 systems technical advisory committee established pursuant to 151 former s. 381.00652. The rules must also allow a person to apply 152 for and receive a variance from a rule requirement upon 153 demonstration that the requirement would cause an undue hardship 154 and granting the variance would not cause or contribute to the 155 exceedance of a total maximum daily load. 156 (h)(f)âOnsite sewage treatment and disposal systems that 157 are permitted before June 21, 2022, may not be placed closer 158 than: 159 1.âSeventy-five feet from a private potable well. 160 2.âTwo hundred feet from a public potable well serving a 161 residential or nonresidential establishment having a total 162 sewage flow of greater than 2,000 gallons per day. 163 3.âOne hundred feet from a public potable well serving a 164 residential or nonresidential establishment having a total 165 sewage flow of less than or equal to 2,000 gallons per day. 166 4.âFifty feet from any nonpotable well. 167 5.âTen feet from any storm sewer pipe, to the maximum 168 extent possible, but in no instance shall the setback be less 169 than 5 feet. 170 6.âSeventy-five feet from the mean high-water line of a 171 tidally influenced surface water body. 172 7.âSeventy-five feet from the mean annual flood line of a 173 permanent nontidal surface water body. 174 8.âFifteen feet from the design high-water line of 175 retention areas, detention areas, or swales designed to contain 176 standing or flowing water for less than 72 hours after a 177 rainfall or the design high-water level of normally dry drainage 178 ditches or normally dry individual lot stormwater retention 179 areas. 180 (i)(g)âThis section and rules adopted under this section 181 relating to soil condition, water table elevation, distance, and 182 other setback requirements must be equally applied to all lots, 183 with the following exceptions: 184 1.âAny residential lot that was platted and recorded on or 185 after January 1, 1972, or that is part of a residential 186 subdivision that was approved by the appropriate permitting 187 agency on or after January 1, 1972, and that was eligible for an 188 onsite sewage treatment and disposal system construction permit 189 on the date of such platting and recording or approval shall be 190 eligible for an onsite sewage treatment and disposal system 191 construction permit, regardless of when the application for a 192 permit is made. If rules in effect at the time the permit 193 application is filed cannot be met, residential lots platted and 194 recorded or approved on or after January 1, 1972, shall, to the 195 maximum extent possible, comply with the rules in effect at the 196 time the permit application is filed. At a minimum, however, 197 those residential lots platted and recorded or approved on or 198 after January 1, 1972, but before January 1, 1983, shall comply 199 with those rules in effect on January 1, 1983, and those 200 residential lots platted and recorded or approved on or after 201 January 1, 1983, shall comply with those rules in effect at the 202 time of such platting and recording or approval. In determining 203 the maximum extent of compliance with current rules that is 204 possible, the department shall allow structures and 205 appurtenances thereto which were authorized at the time such 206 lots were platted and recorded or approved. 207 2.âLots platted before 1972 are subject to a 50-foot 208 minimum surface water setback and are not subject to lot size 209 requirements. The projected daily flow for onsite sewage 210 treatment and disposal systems for lots platted before 1972 may 211 not exceed: 212 a.âTwo thousand five hundred gallons per acre per day for 213 lots served by public water systems as defined in s. 403.852. 214 b.âOne thousand five hundred gallons per acre per day for 215 lots served by water systems regulated under s. 381.0062. 216 (j)1.(h)1.âThe department may grant variances in hardship 217 cases which may be less restrictive than the provisions 218 specified in this section. If a variance is granted and the 219 onsite sewage treatment and disposal system construction permit 220 has been issued, the variance may be transferred with the system 221 construction permit, if the transferee files, within 60 days 222 after the transfer of ownership, an amended construction permit 223 application providing all corrected information and proof of 224 ownership of the property and if the same variance would have 225 been required for the new owner of the property as was 226 originally granted to the original applicant for the variance. A 227 fee is not associated with the processing of this supplemental 228 information. A variance may not be granted under this section 229 until the department is satisfied that: 230 a.âThe hardship was not caused intentionally by the action 231 of the applicant; 232 b.âA reasonable alternative, taking into consideration 233 factors such as cost, does not exist for the treatment of the 234 sewage; and 235 c.âThe discharge from the onsite sewage treatment and 236 disposal system will not adversely affect the health of the 237 applicant or the public or significantly degrade the groundwater 238 or surface waters. 239 240 Where soil conditions, water table elevation, and setback 241 provisions are determined by the department to be satisfactory, 242 special consideration must be given to those lots platted before 243 1972. 244 2.âThe department shall appoint and staff a variance review 245 and advisory committee, which shall meet monthly to recommend 246 agency action on variance requests. The committee shall make its 247 recommendations on variance requests at the meeting in which the 248 application is scheduled for consideration, except for an 249 extraordinary change in circumstances, the receipt of new 250 information that raises new issues, or when the applicant 251 requests an extension. The committee shall consider the criteria 252 in subparagraph 1. in its recommended agency action on variance 253 requests and shall also strive to allow property owners the full 254 use of their land where possible. 255 a.âThe committee is composed of the following: 256 (I)âThe Secretary of Environmental Protection or his or her 257 designee. 258 (II)âA representative from the county health departments. 259 (III)âA representative from the home building industry 260 recommended by the Florida Home Builders Association. 261 (IV)âA representative from the septic tank industry 262 recommended by the Florida Onsite Wastewater Association. 263 (V)âA representative from the Department of Health. 264 (VI)âA representative from the real estate industry who is 265 also a developer in this state who develops lots using onsite 266 sewage treatment and disposal systems, recommended by the 267 Florida Association of Realtors. 268 (VII)âA representative from the engineering profession 269 recommended by the Florida Engineering Society. 270 b.âMembers shall be appointed for a term of 3 years, with 271 such appointments being staggered so that the terms of no more 272 than two members expire in any one year. Members shall serve 273 without remuneration, but if requested, shall be reimbursed for 274 per diem and travel expenses as provided in s. 112.061. 275 3.âThe variance review and advisory committee is not 276 responsible for reviewing water well permitting. However, the 277 committee shall consider all requirements of law related to 278 onsite sewage treatment and disposal systems when making 279 recommendations on variance requests for onsite sewage treatment 280 and disposal system permits. 281 (k)(i)âA construction permit may not be issued for an 282 onsite sewage treatment and disposal system in any area zoned or 283 used for industrial or manufacturing purposes, or its 284 equivalent, where a publicly owned or investor-owned sewage 285 treatment system is available, or where a likelihood exists that 286 the system will receive toxic, hazardous, or industrial waste. 287 An existing onsite sewage treatment and disposal system may be 288 repaired if a publicly owned or investor-owned sewage treatment 289 system is not available within 500 feet of the building sewer 290 stub-out and if system construction and operation standards can 291 be met. This paragraph does not require publicly owned or 292 investor-owned sewage treatment systems to accept anything other 293 than domestic wastewater. 294 1.âA building located in an area zoned or used for 295 industrial or manufacturing purposes, or its equivalent, when 296 such building is served by an onsite sewage treatment and 297 disposal system, must not be occupied until the owner or tenant 298 has obtained written approval from the department. The 299 department may not grant approval when the proposed use of the 300 system is to dispose of toxic, hazardous, or industrial 301 wastewater or toxic or hazardous chemicals. 302 2.âEach person who owns or operates a business or facility 303 in an area zoned or used for industrial or manufacturing 304 purposes, or its equivalent, or who owns or operates a business 305 that has the potential to generate toxic, hazardous, or 306 industrial wastewater or toxic or hazardous chemicals, and uses 307 an onsite sewage treatment and disposal system that is installed 308 on or after July 5, 1989, must obtain an annual system operating 309 permit from the department. A person who owns or operates a 310 business that uses an onsite sewage treatment and disposal 311 system that was installed and approved before July 5, 1989, does 312 not need to obtain a system operating permit. However, upon 313 change of ownership or tenancy, the new owner or operator must 314 notify the department of the change, and the new owner or 315 operator must obtain an annual system operating permit, 316 regardless of the date that the system was installed or 317 approved. 318 3.âThe department shall periodically review and evaluate 319 the continued use of onsite sewage treatment and disposal 320 systems in areas zoned or used for industrial or manufacturing 321 purposes, or its equivalent, and may require the collection and 322 analyses of samples from within and around such systems. If the 323 department finds that toxic or hazardous chemicals or toxic, 324 hazardous, or industrial wastewater have been or are being 325 disposed of through an onsite sewage treatment and disposal 326 system, the department shall initiate enforcement actions 327 against the owner or tenant to ensure adequate cleanup, 328 treatment, and disposal. 329 (l)(j)âAn onsite sewage treatment and disposal system 330 designed by a professional engineer registered in the state and 331 certified by such engineer as complying with performance 332 criteria adopted by the department must be approved by the 333 department subject to the following: 334 1.âThe performance criteria applicable to engineer-designed 335 systems must be limited to those necessary to ensure that such 336 systems do not adversely affect the public health or 337 significantly degrade the groundwater or surface water. Such 338 performance criteria shall include consideration of the quality 339 of system effluent, the proposed total sewage flow per acre, 340 wastewater treatment capabilities of the natural or replaced 341 soil, water quality classification of the potential surface 342 water-receiving body, and the structural and maintenance 343 viability of the system for the treatment of domestic 344 wastewater. However, performance criteria shall address only the 345 performance of a system and not a systemâs design. 346 2.âA person electing to use an engineer-designed system 347 shall, upon completion of the system design, submit such design, 348 certified by a registered professional engineer, to the county 349 health department. The county health department may use an 350 outside consultant to review the engineer-designed system, with 351 the actual cost of such review to be borne by the applicant. 352 Within 5 working days after receiving an engineer-designed 353 system permit application, the county health department shall 354 request additional information if the application is not 355 complete. Within 15 working days after receiving a complete 356 application for an engineer-designed system, the county health 357 department shall issue the permit or, if it determines that the 358 system does not comply with the performance criteria, shall 359 notify the applicant of that determination and refer the 360 application to the department for a determination as to whether 361 the system should be approved, disapproved, or approved with 362 modification. The department engineerâs determination shall 363 prevail over the action of the county health department. The 364 applicant shall be notified in writing of the departmentâs 365 determination and of the applicantâs rights to pursue a variance 366 or seek review under the provisions of chapter 120. 367 3.âThe owner of an engineer-designed performance-based 368 system must maintain a current maintenance service agreement 369 with a maintenance entity permitted by the department. The 370 maintenance entity shall inspect each system at least twice each 371 year and shall report quarterly to the department on the number 372 of systems inspected and serviced. The reports may be submitted 373 electronically. 374 4.âThe property owner of an owner-occupied, single-family 375 residence may be approved and permitted by the department as a 376 maintenance entity for his or her own performance-based 377 treatment system upon written certification from the system 378 manufacturerâs approved representative that the property owner 379 has received training on the proper installation and service of 380 the system. The maintenance service agreement must conspicuously 381 disclose that the property owner has the right to maintain his 382 or her own system and is exempt from contractor registration 383 requirements for performing construction, maintenance, or 384 repairs on the system but is subject to all permitting 385 requirements. 386 5.âThe property owner shall obtain a biennial system 387 operating permit from the department for each system. The 388 department shall inspect the system at least annually, or on 389 such periodic basis as the fee collected permits, and may 390 collect system-effluent samples if appropriate to determine 391 compliance with the performance criteria. The fee for the 392 biennial operating permit shall be collected beginning with the 393 second year of system operation. 394 6.âIf an engineer-designed system fails to properly 395 function or fails to meet performance standards, the system 396 shall be re-engineered, if necessary, to bring the system into 397 compliance with the provisions of this section. 398 (m)(k)âAn innovative system may be approved in conjunction 399 with an engineer-designed site-specific system that is certified 400 by the engineer to meet the performance-based criteria adopted 401 by the department. 402 (n)(l)âFor the Florida Keys, the department shall adopt a 403 special rule for the construction, installation, modification, 404 operation, repair, maintenance, and performance of onsite sewage 405 treatment and disposal systems which considers the unique soil 406 conditions and water table elevations, densities, and setback 407 requirements. On lots where a setback distance of 75 feet from 408 surface waters, saltmarsh, and buttonwood association habitat 409 areas cannot be met, an injection well, approved and permitted 410 by the department, may be used for disposal of effluent from 411 onsite sewage treatment and disposal systems. The following 412 additional requirements apply to onsite sewage treatment and 413 disposal systems in Monroe County: 414 1.âThe county, each municipality, and those special 415 districts established for the purpose of the collection, 416 transmission, treatment, or disposal of sewage shall ensure, in 417 accordance with the specific schedules adopted by the 418 Administration Commission under s. 380.0552, the completion of 419 onsite sewage treatment and disposal system upgrades to meet the 420 requirements of this paragraph. 421 2.âOnsite sewage treatment and disposal systems must cease 422 discharge by December 31, 2015, or must comply with department 423 rules and provide the level of treatment which, on a permitted 424 annual average basis, produces an effluent that contains no more 425 than the following concentrations: 426 a.âBiochemical oxygen demand (CBOD5) of 10 mg/l. 427 b.âSuspended solids of 10 mg/l. 428 c.âTotal nitrogen, expressed as N, of 10 mg/l or a 429 reduction in nitrogen of at least 70 percent. A system that has 430 been tested and certified to reduce nitrogen concentrations by 431 at least 70 percent shall be deemed to be in compliance with 432 this standard. 433 d.âTotal phosphorus, expressed as P, of 1 mg/l. 434 435 In addition, onsite sewage treatment and disposal systems 436 discharging to an injection well must provide basic disinfection 437 as defined by department rule. 438 3.âIn areas not scheduled to be served by a central 439 sewerage system, onsite sewage treatment and disposal systems 440 must, by December 31, 2015, comply with department rules and 441 provide the level of treatment described in subparagraph 2. 442 4.âIn areas scheduled to be served by a central sewerage 443 system by December 31, 2015, if the property owner has paid a 444 connection fee or assessment for connection to the central 445 sewerage system, the property owner may install a holding tank 446 with a high water alarm or an onsite sewage treatment and 447 disposal system that meets the following minimum standards: 448 a.âThe existing tanks must be pumped and inspected and 449 certified as being watertight and free of defects in accordance 450 with department rule; and 451 b.âA sand-lined drainfield or injection well in accordance 452 with department rule must be installed. 453 5.âOnsite sewage treatment and disposal systems must be 454 monitored for total nitrogen and total phosphorus concentrations 455 as required by department rule. 456 6.âThe department shall enforce proper installation, 457 operation, and maintenance of onsite sewage treatment and 458 disposal systems pursuant to this chapter, including ensuring 459 that the appropriate level of treatment described in 460 subparagraph 2. is met. 461 7.âThe authority of a local government, including a special 462 district, to mandate connection of an onsite sewage treatment 463 and disposal system is governed by s. 4, chapter 99-395, Laws of 464 Florida. 465 8.âNotwithstanding any other law, an onsite sewage 466 treatment and disposal system installed after July 1, 2010, in 467 unincorporated Monroe County, excluding special wastewater 468 districts, that complies with the standards in subparagraph 2. 469 is not required to connect to a central sewerage system until 470 December 31, 2020. 471 (o)(m)âA product sold in the state for use in onsite sewage 472 treatment and disposal systems may not contain any substance in 473 concentrations or amounts that would interfere with or prevent 474 the successful operation of such system, or that would cause 475 discharges from such systems to violate applicable water quality 476 standards. The department shall publish criteria for products 477 known or expected to meet the conditions of this paragraph. If a 478 product does not meet such criteria, such product may be sold if 479 the manufacturer satisfactorily demonstrates to the department 480 that the conditions of this paragraph are met. 481 (p)(n)âEvaluations for determining the seasonal high-water 482 table elevations or the suitability of soils for the use of a 483 new onsite sewage treatment and disposal system shall be 484 performed by department personnel, professional engineers 485 registered in the state, or such other persons with expertise, 486 as defined by rule, in making such evaluations. Evaluations for 487 determining mean annual flood lines shall be performed by those 488 persons identified in paragraph (2)(l). The department shall 489 accept evaluations submitted by professional engineers and such 490 other persons as meet the expertise established by this section 491 or by rule unless the department has a reasonable scientific 492 basis for questioning the accuracy or completeness of the 493 evaluation. 494 (q)(o)âAn application for an onsite sewage treatment and 495 disposal system permit shall be completed in full, signed by the 496 owner or the ownerâs authorized representative, or by a 497 contractor licensed under chapter 489, and shall be accompanied 498 by all required exhibits and fees. Specific documentation of 499 property ownership is not required as a prerequisite to the 500 review of an application or the issuance of a permit. The 501 issuance of a permit does not constitute determination by the 502 department of property ownership. 503 (r)(p)âThe department may not require any form of 504 subdivision analysis of property by an owner, developer, or 505 subdivider before submission of an application for an onsite 506 sewage treatment and disposal system. 507 (s)(q)âThis section does not limit the power of a 508 municipality or county to enforce other laws for the protection 509 of the public health and safety. 510 (t)(r)âIn the siting of onsite sewage treatment and 511 disposal systems, including drainfields, shoulders, and slopes, 512 guttering may not be required on single-family residential 513 dwelling units for systems located greater than 5 feet from the 514 roof drip line of the house. If guttering is used on residential 515 dwelling units, the downspouts shall be directed away from the 516 drainfield. 517 (u)(s)âNotwithstanding subparagraph (i)1. (g)1., onsite 518 sewage treatment and disposal systems located in floodways of 519 the Suwannee and Aucilla Rivers must adhere to the following 520 requirements: 521 1.âThe absorption surface of the drainfield may not be 522 subject to flooding based on 10-year flood elevations. Provided, 523 however, for lots or parcels created by the subdivision of land 524 in accordance with applicable local government regulations 525 before January 17, 1990, if an applicant cannot construct a 526 drainfield system with the absorption surface of the drainfield 527 at an elevation equal to or above 10-year flood elevation, the 528 department shall issue a permit for an onsite sewage treatment 529 and disposal system within the 10-year floodplain of rivers, 530 streams, and other bodies of flowing water if all of the 531 following criteria are met: 532 a.âThe lot is at least one-half acre in size; 533 b.âThe bottom of the drainfield is at least 36 inches above 534 the 2-year flood elevation; and 535 c.âThe applicant installs a waterless, incinerating, or 536 organic waste composting toilet and a graywater system and 537 drainfield in accordance with department rules; an aerobic 538 treatment unit and drainfield in accordance with department 539 rules; a system that is capable of reducing effluent nitrate by 540 at least 50 percent in accordance with department rules; or a 541 system other than a system using alternative drainfield 542 materials in accordance with department rules. The United States 543 Department of Agriculture Soil Conservation Service soil maps, 544 State of Florida Water Management District data, and Federal 545 Emergency Management Agency Flood Insurance maps are resources 546 that shall be used to identify flood-prone areas. 547 2.âThe use of fill or mounding to elevate a drainfield 548 system out of the 10-year floodplain of rivers, streams, or 549 other bodies of flowing water may not be permitted if such a 550 system lies within a regulatory floodway of the Suwannee and 551 Aucilla Rivers. In cases where the 10-year flood elevation does 552 not coincide with the boundaries of the regulatory floodway, the 553 regulatory floodway will be considered for the purposes of this 554 subsection to extend at a minimum to the 10-year flood 555 elevation. 556 (v)1.(t)1.âThe owner of an aerobic treatment unit system 557 shall maintain a current maintenance service agreement with an 558 aerobic treatment unit maintenance entity permitted by the 559 department. The maintenance entity shall inspect each aerobic 560 treatment unit system at least twice each year and shall report 561 quarterly to the department on the number of aerobic treatment 562 unit systems inspected and serviced. The reports may be 563 submitted electronically. 564 2.âThe property owner of an owner-occupied, single-family 565 residence may be approved and permitted by the department as a 566 maintenance entity for his or her own aerobic treatment unit 567 system upon written certification from the system manufacturerâs 568 approved representative that the property owner has received 569 training on the proper installation and service of the system. 570 The maintenance entity service agreement must conspicuously 571 disclose that the property owner has the right to maintain his 572 or her own system and is exempt from contractor registration 573 requirements for performing construction, maintenance, or 574 repairs on the system but is subject to all permitting 575 requirements. 576 3.âA septic tank contractor licensed under part III of 577 chapter 489, if approved by the manufacturer, may not be denied 578 access by the manufacturer to aerobic treatment unit system 579 training or spare parts for maintenance entities. After the 580 original warranty period, component parts for an aerobic 581 treatment unit system may be replaced with parts that meet 582 manufacturerâs specifications but are manufactured by others. 583 The maintenance entity shall maintain documentation of the 584 substitute partâs equivalency for 2 years and shall provide such 585 documentation to the department upon request. 586 4.âThe owner of an aerobic treatment unit system shall 587 obtain a system operating permit from the department and allow 588 the department to inspect during reasonable hours each aerobic 589 treatment unit system at least annually, and such inspection may 590 include collection and analysis of system-effluent samples for 591 performance criteria established by rule of the department. 592 (w)(u)âThe department may require the submission of 593 detailed system construction plans that are prepared by a 594 professional engineer registered in this state. The department 595 shall establish by rule criteria for determining when such a 596 submission is required. 597 (x)(v)âAny permit issued and approved by the department for 598 the installation, modification, or repair of an onsite sewage 599 treatment and disposal system shall transfer with the title to 600 the property in a real estate transaction. A title may not be 601 encumbered at the time of transfer by new permit requirements by 602 a governmental entity for an onsite sewage treatment and 603 disposal system which differ from the permitting requirements in 604 effect at the time the system was permitted, modified, or 605 repaired. An inspection of a system may not be mandated by a 606 governmental entity at the point of sale in a real estate 607 transaction. This paragraph does not affect a septic tank phase 608 out deferral program implemented by a consolidated government as 609 defined in s. 9, Art. VIII of the State Constitution of 1885. 610 (y)(w)âA governmental entity, including a municipality, 611 county, or statutorily created commission, may not require an 612 engineer-designed performance-based treatment system, excluding 613 a passive engineer-designed performance-based treatment system, 614 before the completion of the Florida Onsite Sewage Nitrogen 615 Reduction Strategies Project. This paragraph does not apply to a 616 governmental entity, including a municipality, county, or 617 statutorily created commission, which adopted a local law, 618 ordinance, or regulation on or before January 31, 2012. 619 Notwithstanding this paragraph, an engineer-designed 620 performance-based treatment system may be used to meet the 621 requirements of the variance review and advisory committee 622 recommendations. 623 (z)1.(x)1.âAn onsite sewage treatment and disposal system 624 is not considered abandoned if the system is disconnected from a 625 structure that was made unusable or destroyed following a 626 disaster and if the system was properly functioning at the time 627 of disconnection and was not adversely affected by the disaster. 628 The onsite sewage treatment and disposal system may be 629 reconnected to a rebuilt structure if: 630 a.âThe reconnection of the system is to the same type of 631 structure which contains the same number of bedrooms or fewer, 632 if the square footage of the structure is less than or equal to 633 110 percent of the original square footage of the structure that 634 existed before the disaster; 635 b.âThe system is not a sanitary nuisance; and 636 c.âThe system has not been altered without prior 637 authorization. 638 2.âAn onsite sewage treatment and disposal system that 639 serves a property that is foreclosed upon is not considered 640 abandoned. 641 (aa)(y)âIf an onsite sewage treatment and disposal system 642 permittee receives, relies upon, and undertakes construction of 643 a system based upon a validly issued construction permit under 644 rules applicable at the time of construction but a change to a 645 rule occurs within 5 years after the approval of the system for 646 construction but before the final approval of the system, the 647 rules applicable and in effect at the time of construction 648 approval apply at the time of final approval if fundamental site 649 conditions have not changed between the time of construction 650 approval and final approval. 651 (bb)(z)âAn existing-system inspection or evaluation and 652 assessment, or a modification, replacement, or upgrade of an 653 onsite sewage treatment and disposal system is not required for 654 a remodeling addition or modification to a single-family home if 655 a bedroom is not added. However, a remodeling addition or 656 modification to a single-family home may not cover any part of 657 the existing system or encroach upon a required setback or the 658 unobstructed area. To determine if a setback or the unobstructed 659 area is impacted, the local health department shall review and 660 verify a floor plan and site plan of the proposed remodeling 661 addition or modification to the home submitted by a remodeler 662 which shows the location of the system, including the distance 663 of the remodeling addition or modification to the home from the 664 onsite sewage treatment and disposal system. The local health 665 department may visit the site or otherwise determine the best 666 means of verifying the information submitted. A verification of 667 the location of a system is not an inspection or evaluation and 668 assessment of the system. The review and verification must be 669 completed within 7 business days after receipt by the local 670 health department of a floor plan and site plan. If the review 671 and verification is not completed within such time, the 672 remodeling addition or modification to the single-family home, 673 for the purposes of this paragraph, is approved. 674 Section 2.âEffective July 1, 2026, subsection (10) is added 675 to section 381.0065, Florida Statutes, to read: 676 381.0065âOnsite sewage treatment and disposal systems; 677 regulation.â 678 (10)âADOPTION OF NEW RULES.âAny new rule for the use and 679 installation of onsite sewage treatment and disposal systems 680 adopted by the department under this section does not apply to 681 permit applications submitted within 90 days after the date such 682 rule is adopted. 683 Section 3.âParagraph (i) of subsection (2), paragraph (b) 684 of subsection (4), paragraph (j) of subsection (7), and 685 paragraph (a) of subsection (9) of section 380.0552, Florida 686 Statutes, are amended to read: 687 380.0552âFlorida Keys Area; protection and designation as 688 area of critical state concern.â 689 (2)âLEGISLATIVE INTENT.âIt is the intent of the Legislature 690 to: 691 (i)âProtect and improve the nearshore water quality of the 692 Florida Keys through federal, state, and local funding of water 693 quality improvement projects, including the construction and 694 operation of wastewater management facilities that meet the 695 requirements of ss. 381.0065(4)(n) and 403.086(11) ss. 696 381.0065(4)(l) and 403.086(11), as applicable. 697 (4)âREMOVAL OF DESIGNATION.â 698 (b)âBeginning November 30, 2010, the state land planning 699 agency shall annually submit a written report to the 700 Administration Commission describing the progress of the Florida 701 Keys Area toward completing the work program tasks specified in 702 commission rules. The land planning agency shall recommend 703 removing the Florida Keys Area from being designated as an area 704 of critical state concern to the commission if it determines 705 that: 706 1.âAll of the work program tasks have been completed, 707 including construction of, operation of, and connection to 708 central wastewater management facilities pursuant to s. 709 403.086(11) and upgrade of onsite sewage treatment and disposal 710 systems pursuant to s. 381.0065(4)(n) s. 381.0065(4)(l); 711 2.âAll local comprehensive plans and land development 712 regulations and the administration of such plans and regulations 713 are adequate to protect the Florida Keys Area, fulfill the 714 legislative intent specified in subsection (2), and are 715 consistent with and further the principles guiding development; 716 and 717 3.âA local government has adopted a resolution at a public 718 hearing recommending the removal of the designation. 719 (7)âPRINCIPLES FOR GUIDING DEVELOPMENT.âState, regional, 720 and local agencies and units of government in the Florida Keys 721 Area shall coordinate their plans and conduct their programs and 722 regulatory activities consistent with the principles for guiding 723 development as specified in chapter 27F-8, Florida 724 Administrative Code, as amended effective August 23, 1984, which 725 is adopted and incorporated herein by reference. For the 726 purposes of reviewing the consistency of the adopted plan, or 727 any amendments to that plan, with the principles for guiding 728 development, and any amendments to the principles, the 729 principles shall be construed as a whole and specific provisions 730 may not be construed or applied in isolation from the other 731 provisions. However, the principles for guiding development are 732 repealed 18 months from July 1, 1986. After repeal, any plan 733 amendments must be consistent with the following principles: 734 (j)âEnsuring the improvement of nearshore water quality by 735 requiring the construction and operation of wastewater 736 management facilities that meet the requirements of ss. 737 381.0065(4)(n) and 403.086(11) ss. 381.0065(4)(l) and 738 403.086(11), as applicable, and by directing growth to areas 739 served by central wastewater treatment facilities through permit 740 allocation systems. 741 (9)âMODIFICATION TO PLANS AND REGULATIONS.â 742 (a)âAny land development regulation or element of a local 743 comprehensive plan in the Florida Keys Area may be enacted, 744 amended, or rescinded by a local government, but the enactment, 745 amendment, or rescission becomes effective only upon approval by 746 the state land planning agency. The state land planning agency 747 shall review the proposed change to determine if it is in 748 compliance with the principles for guiding development specified 749 in chapter 27F-8, Florida Administrative Code, as amended 750 effective August 23, 1984, and must approve or reject the 751 requested changes within 60 days after receipt. Amendments to 752 local comprehensive plans in the Florida Keys Area must also be 753 reviewed for compliance with the following: 754 1.âConstruction schedules and detailed capital financing 755 plans for wastewater management improvements in the annually 756 adopted capital improvements element, and standards for the 757 construction of wastewater treatment and disposal facilities or 758 collection systems that meet or exceed the criteria in s. 759 403.086(11) for wastewater treatment and disposal facilities or 760 s. 381.0065(4)(n) s. 381.0065(4)(l) for onsite sewage treatment 761 and disposal systems. 762 2.âGoals, objectives, and policies to protect public safety 763 and welfare in the event of a natural disaster by maintaining a 764 hurricane evacuation clearance time for permanent residents of 765 no more than 24.5 hours. The hurricane evacuation clearance time 766 shall be determined by a hurricane evacuation study conducted in 767 accordance with a professionally accepted methodology and 768 approved by the state land planning agency. For purposes of 769 hurricane evacuation clearance time: 770 a.âMobile home residents are not considered permanent 771 residents. 772 b.âThe City of Key West Area of Critical State Concern 773 established by chapter 28-36, Florida Administrative Code, shall 774 be included in the hurricane evacuation study and is subject to 775 the evacuation requirements of this subsection. 776 Section 4.âParagraph (c) of subsection (6) of section 777 381.00651, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 778 381.00651âPeriodic evaluation and assessment of onsite 779 sewage treatment and disposal systems.â 780 (6)âThe requirements for an onsite sewage treatment and 781 disposal system evaluation and assessment program are as 782 follows: 783 (c)âRepair of systems.âThe local ordinance may not require 784 a repair, modification, or replacement of a system as a result 785 of an evaluation unless the evaluation identifies a system 786 failure. For purposes of this subsection, the term âsystem 787 failureâ means a condition existing within an onsite sewage 788 treatment and disposal system which results in the discharge of 789 untreated or partially treated wastewater onto the ground 790 surface or into surface water or that results in the failure of 791 building plumbing to discharge properly and presents a sanitary 792 nuisance. A system is not in failure if the system does not have 793 a minimum separation distance between the drainfield and the 794 wettest season water table or if an obstruction in a sanitary 795 line or an effluent screen or filter prevents effluent from 796 flowing into a drainfield. If a system failure is identified and 797 several allowable remedial measures are available to resolve the 798 failure, the system owner may choose the least costly allowable 799 remedial measure to fix the system. There may be instances in 800 which a pump-out is sufficient to resolve a system failure. 801 Allowable remedial measures to resolve a system failure are 802 limited to what is necessary to resolve the failure and must 803 meet, to the maximum extent practicable, the requirements of the 804 repair code in effect when the repair is made, subject to the 805 exceptions specified in s. 381.0065(4)(i) s. 381.0065(4)(g). An 806 engineer-designed performance-based treatment system to reduce 807 nutrients may not be required as an alternative remediation 808 measure to resolve the failure of a conventional system. 809 Section 5.âExcept as expressly provided in this act, this 810 act shall take effect upon becoming a law.